New Jersey, session 221, S542.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   Section 1 of P.L.1992, c.209 (C.2C:12-10) is amended to read as follows: 1.   a.  As used in this act: (1)   "Course of conduct" means repeatedly maintaining a visual or physical proximity to a person; directly, indirectly, or through third parties, by any action, method, device, or means, following, monitoring, observing, surveilling, threatening, or communicating to or about, a person, or interfering with a person's property; repeatedly committing harassment against a person; or repeatedly conveying, or causing to be conveyed, verbal or written threats or threats conveyed by any other means of communication or threats implied by conduct or a combination thereof directed at or toward a person. (2)   "Repeatedly" means on two or more occasions. (3)   "Emotional distress" means significant mental suffering or distress. (4)   "Cause a reasonable person to fear" means to cause fear which a reasonable victim, similarly situated, would have under the circumstances. b.   A person is guilty of stalking, a crime of the fourth degree, if he purposefully or knowingly engages in a course of conduct directed at a specific person that would cause a reasonable person to fear for his safety or the safety of a third person or suffer other emotional distress.  Stalking is a crime of the third degree if the persons course of conduct is carried out or assisted by means of installation or use of any electronic, mechanical or other device as defined in subsection d. of section 2 of P.L.1968, c.409 (C.2A:156A-2), or installation or use of a computer program as defined in subsection e. of section 2 of P.L.1984, c.184 (C.2C:20-23), on a cellular phone or wireless mobile device owned, subscribed to, or used by the victim, in order to intercept any form of communication or acquire that communication from electronic storage kept by an electronic communication service or remote computing service, as those terms are defined in subsections p., q., and s. of section 2 of P.L.1968, c.409 (C.2A:156A-2), or to intercept or acquire the victims location information. c.     A person is guilty of a crime of the third degree if he commits the crime of stalking in violation of an existing court order prohibiting the behavior. d.    A person who commits a second or subsequent offense of stalking against the same victim is guilty of a crime of the third degree. e.     A person is guilty of a crime of the third degree if he commits the crime of stalking while serving a term of imprisonment or while on parole or probation as the result of a conviction for any indictable offense under the laws of this State, any other state or the United States. f.     This act shall not apply to conduct which occurs during organized group picketing. (cf: P.L.2009, c.28, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.